Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 72. State Regulation of Fireworks.

Collateral references. —

31A Am. Jur. 2d, Explosions and Explosives, §§ 4,
6,
13,
16,
101 — 112.

35 C.J.S., Explosives, §§ 1 — 3, 12, 13, 36, 118, 123.

Sec. 18.72.010.
Regulation of sale of dangerous fireworks.

The sale or offer to sell dangerous fireworks at wholesale or retail for any purpose other than industrial, agricultural, wildlife control, or public display is prohibited.

A person desiring to use dangerous fireworks for industrial, agricultural, wildlife control, or public display purposes shall first comply with the permit requirements of the fire safety code.

All dangerous fireworks shall be purchased from a fireworks wholesaler licensed as such in this state. A fireworks wholesaler may not sell dangerous fireworks to anyone unless the wholesaler has a currently valid permit required by the fire safety code, the number of which shall be affixed to each record of sale by the fireworks wholesaler and maintained as a permanent record of the sale.

History.

(§ 1 ch 116 SLA 1969)

Sec. 18.72.020.
Regulation of sale of salable fireworks.

A person holding a permit required by the fire safety code may sell or offer for sale salable fireworks if

the person has submitted to the state fire marshal a policy, or a certified true copy of a policy, of public liability and products liability insurance, including both accident and occurrence coverage, provided by the wholesale company selling fireworks to the person, in the amount of at least $200,000 for bodily injury or death and at least $50,000 property damage and the person is named as an insured party upon the policy and the policy is continuously in force while the person is engaged in the retail sale of fireworks; and

an endorsement fee of $10 is paid to the state fire marshal for an endorsement that is valid for two years or portions of two years during which the permit holder is engaged in the retail sale of fireworks.

Upon approval of the insurance required in (a) of this section, the permit of the holder shall be endorsed by the state fire marshal to indicate the holder’s right to sell fireworks at retail, and shall indicate an expiration of the authority. The expiration date shall coincide with the expiration date of the permit holder’s liability insurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 116 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1981; am § 22 ch 81 SLA 1984)

Sec. 18.72.030.
Fireworks wholesaler’s license.

A person who desires to sell fireworks at wholesale in the state shall first make verified application for a license to the state fire marshal on forms provided by the state fire marshal. The forms must require the applicant to supply the applicant’s social security number if the applicant is a natural person. The application shall be accompanied by an annual license fee of $50.

The license required under (a) of this section is valid until December 31 of the year during which it is issued and is renewable upon

the payment of each subsequent annual license fee and affirmation that the information contained in the wholesaler’s original application for a fireworks wholesaler’s license is currently accurate; and

supplying the wholesaler’s social security number if it has not previously been supplied under (a) of this section and if the wholesaler is a natural person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 116 SLA 1969; am § 2 ch 24 SLA 1981; am § 31 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed amendments to this section by § 148(c), ch. 87, SLA 1997, as amended by § 53, ch. 132, SLA 1998, which were to take effect July 1, 2001, were repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Sections 10, 14, and 17, ch. 54, SLA 2001, which were to amend (a) and repeal (b)(2) of this section effective July 1, 2003, were repealed by § 3, ch. 37, SLA 2003.

Sec. 18.72.040.
Criminal penalty.

A person who recklessly fails to comply with a provision of this chapter or fireworks regulations adopted in the fire safety code is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. Each day of noncompliance constitutes a separate offense. In this section, “recklessly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 116 SLA 1969; am § 4 ch 120 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For fines and sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 18.72.050.
[Renumbered as AS 18.72.100.]

Sec. 18.72.060.
Municipal regulation of fireworks.

This chapter and fireworks regulations adopted under the fire safety code supersede the provisions of an ordinance adopted by a city or borough, whether before or after May 23, 1969, that are less restrictive than this chapter or the code. However, nothing in this section affects the authority of a city or organized borough under other law to prohibit or regulate more restrictively than this chapter the offering for sale, exposure for sale, sale, use, or explosion of fireworks.

History.

(§ 1 ch 116 SLA 1969)

Sec. 18.72.100.
Definitions.

In this chapter and fireworks regulations adopted in the state fire safety code,

“dangerous fireworks” includes all fireworks that are not defined as salable fireworks;

“fire safety code” means the fire safety code of the state adopted and administered by the division of fire prevention of the Department of Public Safety;

“fireworks” means salable fireworks or dangerous fireworks;

“salable fireworks” are 1.4 G fireworks, as defined by the National Fire Protection Association, and, more specifically, shall include and be limited to the following:

roman candles, not exceeding 10 balls spaced uniformly in the tube, total pyrotechnic composition not to exceed 20 grams each in weight, any inside tube diameter not to exceed 3/8 inch;

skyrockets with sticks, total pyrotechnic composition not to exceed 20 grams each in weight, and the inside tube diameter not to exceed 1/2 inch, with the rocket sticks being securely fastened to the tubes;

helicopter type rockets, total pyrotechnic composition not to exceed 20 grams each in weight, and the inside tube diameter not to exceed 1/2 inch;

cylindrical fountains, total pyrotechnic composition not to exceed 75 grams each in weight, and the inside tube diameter not to exceed 3/4 inch;

cone fountains, total pyrotechnic composition not to exceed 50 grams each in weight;

wheels, total pyrotechnic composition not to exceed 60 grams for each driver unit or 240 grams for each complete wheel, and the inside tube diameter of driver units not to exceed 1/2 inch;

illuminating torches and colored fire in any form, total pyrotechnic composition not to exceed 100 grams each in weight;

dipped sticks, the pyrotechnic composition of which contains chlorate or perchlorate, that do not exceed five grams, and sparklers, the composition of which does not exceed 100 grams each and that contains no magnesium or magnesium and a chlorate or perchlorate;

mines and shells of which the mortar is an integral part, total pyrotechnic composition not to exceed 40 grams each in weight;

firecrackers with soft casings, the external dimensions of which do not exceed one and one-half inches in length or one-quarter inch in diameter, total pyrotechnic composition not to exceed two grains each in weight;

novelties consisting of two or more devices enumerated in this paragraph when approved by the Bureau of Explosives.

History.

(§ 1 ch 116 SLA 1969; am § 31 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

18.72.050

. Renumbered in 1994. In 1989, “1/2 inch” was substituted for “1/2 unit” in subparagraph (4)(F) to correct a manifest error in the original enactment.